California statutes. Insurance Code
For purposes of this section, failure to provide a required telephone number, time of day, producer number, producer signature, date or information that is omitted but can be determined by questions answered or information provided in other sections of the application or documents submitted as part of the application, shall be considered an omission or mistake immaterial to determining the eligibility of the applicant for the plan coverage. A certificate of eligibility that is submitted to the plan as to which the applicant did not demonstrate a good faith effort in completing or where the applicant has made a willful misrepresentation shall not be subject to this section. In
 the event that the defect is material to determining the eligibility of the applicant for coverage, the policy is void from inception.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1255, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.1.

(a) An insurer shall mail a policy within 30 days of the receipt of an assignment.

(b) Upon the determination of an insurer to whom an assignment is made that the application of an insured is defective, the insurer shall immediately give written notice of the defect to the insured and to the agent or broker of record that the insured has 15 days from the mailing of the notice of defect to correct the defect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.2.

(a) An insurer shall acknowledge in writing within 15 days the receipt of a request for the endorsement of an assigned risk policy. The mailing of the endorsement within 15 days of receipt shall constitute acknowledgement of receipt.

(b) Upon receipt of a completed request for an endorsement that contains all information necessary for the issuance of an endorsement, the insurer shall issue and mail the endorsement to the insured within 30 days of the request for the endorsement.

(c) As used in this section,
 “endorsement” means an amendment of a policy, such as a loss payee endorsement, the addition or deletion of insureds, or the addition or deletion of coverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 509, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.3.

Any return premium checks due to an insured or to a lender subject to the provisions of subdivision (g) of Section 673 on account of a cancellation or endorsement shall be mailed within 30 days of the effective date of the cancellation or endorsement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 509, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.4.

Every insurer to whom an assignment is made shall do all of the following:

(a) Provide policyholders with information on how to report claims.

(b) Provide brokers and agents with a toll-free telephone number or accept their collect calls for the purpose of providing agents and brokers with a means of communicating with the insurer in order to rectify errors in applications or endorsements for assigned-risk coverage.

(c) Reply in writing within 15 days to complaints
 disputing the amount of premium charged for coverage under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 509, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.5.

No insurance agent, broker or solicitor shall make any charge to the applicant, directly or indirectly, for furnishing any person the necessary application forms, technical assistance and services necessary to perfect an application through the plan other than such commission as is paid by the insurer pursuant to the provisions of such plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 213.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.6.

Every insurer, agent, or broker assigned an application by the plan may conclusively rely on the acceptance, rejection, or waiver of coverages stated in the application signed by the applicant. A policy shall only be issued for the coverages, limits, and deductibles stated in the application assigned by the plan. This section shall apply to all applications assigned by the plan which are submitted to the plan by a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11624.7.

Within 60 days after the effective date of any policy issued or renewed under this article, the insurer shall obtain from the Department of Motor Vehicles, or from a subscribing loss underwriting exchange carrier, a report on the applicant and any other person who may reasonably be expected to operate the applicant’s motor vehicle with the permission of the applicant. Any premium adjustments that occur as a result of the inspection of the reports shall be billed within the same 60-day period. This section does not apply to amendments of a policy other than upon
 original issuance or renewal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 42, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11625.

If an insurer admitted to transact liability insurance fails to subscribe to the plan or to any amendments thereto, the commissioner shall give 10 days’ written notice to such insurer to so subscribe. If such insurer fails to comply with such notice, then the commissioner may, after hearing upon notice, suspend the certificate of authority of such insurer to transact liability insurance in this State until such insurer does so subscribe. Proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

11626.

If the commissioner, after hearing upon not less than ten (10) days’ notice, finds that any insurer has failed to perform any of the duties required of it by this article or by the plan, other than those duties enumerated in Section 11625, he may issue an order to such insurer specifying in what manner and to what extent he finds the insurer to have so failed and requiring, within a reasonable time, not less than 10 days, compliance with such requirements. If within the period specified in the order the insurer fails to comply with such order, such insurer shall, in addition to any other penalty provided by law, forfeit to the State a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for
 each such failure. The commissioner may bring an action in his own name against the insurer to collect the said penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------

11626.1.

(a) No insurer shall downgrade the rating, or otherwise adversely affect the insurability, of a person insured under Section 11622.1 solely because of that person’s participation in the assigned risk plan or because that person contracts with a person insured under Section 11622.1.

(b) An insurer violating subdivision (a) is subject to the penalties set forth in Section 11626, and shall restore the insurance rating, insurability, and coverage of any person harmed by the violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 155, Sec. 4.   Effective June 16, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

11627.

In this article, “insurer” includes reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Motor Vehicle Liability Insurance [11628. - 11629.5.]

11628.

(a) (1) No admitted insurer that is licensed to issue and issuing motor vehicle liability policies, as defined in Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code, shall fail or refuse to accept an application for that insurance, to issue that insurance to an applicant therefor, or issue or cancel that insurance under conditions less favorable to the insured than in other comparable cases, except for reasons applicable alike to persons of every characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code, including, but not limited to, language, or persons of the same geographic area; nor shall any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code, including, but not
 limited to, language, or location within a geographic area, of itself, constitute a condition or risk for which a higher rate, premium, or charge may be required of the insured for that insurance.

(2) As used in this section “geographic area” means a portion of this state of not less than 20 square miles defined by description in the rating manual of an insurer or in the rating manual of a rating bureau of which the insurer is a member or subscriber. In order that geographic areas used for rating purposes may reflect homogeneity of loss experience, a record of loss experience for the geographic area shall include the breakdown of actual loss experience statistics by ZIP Code area (as designated by the United States Postal Service) within each geographic area for family owned private passenger motor vehicles and lightweight commercial motor vehicles, under
 112-ton load capacity, used for local service or retail delivery, normally within a 50-mile radius of garaging, and that are not part of a fleet of five or more motor vehicles under one ownership. A record of loss experience for the geographic area, including that statistical data by ZIP Code area, shall be submitted biennially to the commissioner for examination by each insurer licensed to issue and issuing motor vehicle liability policies, motor vehicle physical damage policies, or both. Loss experience shall include separate loss data for each type of coverage, including liability or physical damage coverage, underwritten. The biennial report shall include the insurer’s statewide loss ratio, loss adjustment expense ratio, expense ratio, and combined ratio on its assigned-risk business. Statewide summary data shall be submitted annually to the commissioner. An insurer may satisfy its obligation to report
 statistical data under this subdivision by providing its loss experience data and statewide expense ratio and combined ratio on its assigned-risk business to a rating or advisory organization for submission to the commissioner. This data shall be made available to the public by the commissioner biennially after examination. However, the data shall be released in aggregate form by ZIP Code or statewide basis in order that no individual insurer’s loss experience for any specific geographic area be revealed. Differentiation in rates between geographical areas shall not constitute unfair discrimination.

(3) All information reported to the department pursuant to this subdivision shall be confidential.

(4) As used in this section:

(A) “Language” means the inability to speak, read, write, or comprehend the English
 language.

(B) “Dependents” shall include, but not be limited to, issue regardless of generation.

(C) “Spouse” shall be determined without regard to current marital status.

(b) The commissioner may require insurers with combined ratios on statewide assigned-risk business that are 10 percent above the mean combined ratio for all plan participants to also report the following:

(1) The reason for the excessive ratio.

(2) A plan for reducing the ratio, and when the reduction can be expected to occur. The commissioner may require insurers subject to this subdivision to provide periodic reports on the progress in reducing the combined ratio.

(c) (1) No admitted insurer, licensed to issue and issuing motor vehicle liability insurance policies as defined in Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code, shall fail or refuse to accept an application for that insurance, refuse to issue that insurance to an applicant therefor, or cancel that insurance solely for the reason that the applicant for that insurance or any insured is employed in a specific occupation, or is on active duty service in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from doing any of the following:

(A) Considering the occupation of the applicant or insured as a condition or risk for which a higher rate or discounted rate may be required or offered for coverage in the course and scope of his or her occupation.

(B) Charging a deviated rate to any classification of risks involving a specific occupation, or grouping thereof, if the rate meets the requirements of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 1850.4) of Part 2 of Division 1 and is based upon actuarial data that demonstrates a significant actual historical differential between past losses or expenses attributable to the specific occupation, or grouping thereof, and the past losses or expenses attributable to other classification of risks. For purposes of compiling that actuarial data for a specific occupation or grouping thereof, a person shall be deemed employed in the occupation in which that data is compiled if any of the following is true:

(i) The majority of his or her employment during the previous year was in the occupation.

(ii) The majority of his or her aggregate earnings for the immediate preceding three-year
 period were derived from the occupation.

(iii) The person is a member in good standing of a union that is an authorized collective bargaining agent for persons engaged in the occupation.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to include in the definition of “occupation” any status or activity that does not result in remuneration for work done or services performed, or self-employment in a business operated out of an applicant’s or insured’s place of residence or persons engaged in the renting, leasing, selling, repossessing, rebuilding, wrecking, or salvaging of motor vehicles.

(d) Nothing in this section shall limit or restrict the ability of an insurer to refuse to accept an application for or refuse to issue or cancel insurance for the reason that it is a commercial vehicle or based upon the consideration
 of a vehicle’s size, weight, design, or intended use.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that actuarial data by occupation may be examined for credibility by the commissioner on the same basis as any other automobile insurance data that he or she is empowered to examine.

(f) (1) Except as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 11620), nothing in this section or in Article 10 (commencing with Section 1861.01) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 1 or in any other provision of this code, shall prohibit an insurer from limiting the issuance or renewal of insurance, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 660, to persons who engage in, or have formerly engaged in, governmental or military service or segments of categories thereof, and their spouses, dependents, direct descendants, and former dependents or spouses.

(2) The term “military service” includes, but is not limited to, officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons, officer and warrant officer candidates, cadets or midshipmen at a service academy, cadets or midshipmen in advance Reserve Officer Training Corps programs or on Reserve Officer Training Corps program scholarships, National Guard officer candidates, students in government-sponsored precommissioning programs, and foreign military officers while on temporary duty in the United States.

(g) Any person subject to regulation by the commissioner pursuant to this code who fails to comply with a data call required by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be liable to the state for a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each 30-day period that the person is not in compliance, unless the failure to comply is willful, in which case
 the civil penalty shall be in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each 30-day period that the person is not in compliance, but not to exceed an aggregate amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). The commissioner shall collect the amount so payable and may bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California to enforce collection. These penalties shall be in addition to other penalties provided by law.

(h) This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Rosenthal Auto Insurance Nondiscrimination Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 362, Sec. 6.   (AB 2734)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11628.3.

(a) Based on the actuarial and loss experience data available to each insurer, including the driving records of mature driver improvement course graduates, as recorded by the Department of Motor Vehicles, every admitted insurer shall provide for an appropriate percentage of reduction in premium rates for motor vehicle liability insurance for principal operators who are 55 years of age or older and who produce proof of successful completion of the mature driver improvement course provided for and approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Section 1675 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) The insured shall enroll in and successfully complete the course described in subdivision (a) once every three years in order to continue to be eligible for an appropriate percentage of reduced premium.

(c) The percentage of premium reduction required by subdivision (a) shall be reassessed by the insurer upon renewal of the insured’s policy. The insured’s eligibility for any percentage of premium reduction shall be effective for a three-year period from the date of successful completion of the course described in subdivision (a), except that the insurer may discontinue the reduced premium rate if the insured is in any case:

(1) Involved in an accident for which the insured is at fault, as determined by the insurer.

(2) Convicted of a violation of Division 11 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Vehicle Code, except Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 22500) of that division, or of a traffic related offense involving alcohol or narcotics.

(d) The percentage of premium rate reduction required by subdivision (a) does not apply in the event the insured enrolls in, and successfully completes, an approved course pursuant to a court order provided for in Section 42005 of the Vehicle Code. Nothing in this subdivision precludes an insured from also enrolling in a driver improvement course.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1325, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1987, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 1325.)
-------------------------------------------

11628.5.

No admitted insurer, licensed to issue motor vehicle liability policies as defined in Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code, shall fail or refuse to accept an application from a handicapped person for such insurance, or to issue such insurance to a handicapped applicant therefor solely because of handicap, or to issue or cancel such insurance under conditions less favorable to handicapped persons than nonhandicapped persons; nor shall a handicap itself constitute a condition or risk for which a higher rate, premium, or charge may be required of a handicapped person for such insurance.

As used in this section, “handicapped person” and “handicapped applicant” refer only to persons who have suffered an impairment of physical ability because of amputation or loss of function which impairment has been compensated for, when necessary, by vehicle equipment adaptation or modification; or who have suffered an impairment of hearing which impairment has been compensated for, when necessary, either by sensory equipment adaptation or modification; or who have suffered an impairment of speech; provided, that the insurer may require a handicapped applicant for such insurance or the renewal of such insurance to furnish proof that he or she has qualified for a new or renewed drivers license through the California Department of Motor Vehicles since the occurrence of the handicapping condition.

If such insurer can justify a higher rate, premium, or charge for handicapped persons with actuarial evidence, a higher rate, premium, or charge may be required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 524.)
-------------------------------------------

11628.7.

No admitted insurer, licensed to issue motor vehicle liability policies as defined in Section 16450 of the Vehicle Code, shall fail or refuse to accept an application for that insurance, or to issue that insurance, on the basis that the owner of the motor vehicle to be insured is blind. However, notwithstanding any other provision of law, an admitted insurer may exclude from coverage under the policy the unlicensed owner of a motor vehicle who is blind for injuries and damages incurred while the insured vehicle is operated by an unlicensed owner who is blind.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from applying its usual and customary underwriting and rating criteria with respect to the operators of the vehicle to be insured, including, but not limited to, the loss experience the insurer has had with respect to the insured vehicle.

No insurer shall raise the premiums of an insured blind person or shall cancel the policy of an insured blind person solely on the basis that the operators of the insured vehicle are changed frequently.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.

Each separate act of an insurer or its agent in violation of Section 11628 or 11628.5 shall render the insurer liable in damages in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100), plus a reasonable allowance for attorneys’ fees incurred in connection with the prosecution of the action, which may be recovered in an action at law brought for that purpose by the person aggrieved by any such act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.5.

Any insurer which has refused to issue to an applicant a policy of insurance in violation of Section 11628 or 11628.5 and which has been required to pay damages for the violation pursuant to Section 11629 shall pay as additional damages the amount by which the rates which the applicant found it necessary to pay to obtain other insurance exceed the rates of the insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5.  California Low-Cost Automobile Insurance Program  [11629.7. - 11629.88.]

11629.7.

(a) There is established, within the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan established under Section 11620, a low-cost automobile insurance program for all counties in California.

(b) The commissioner, after a public hearing, shall approve or issue a reasonable plan for the equitable apportionment, among insurers required to participate in the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan established under Section 11620, of persons who are eligible to purchase through the program a low-cost automobile insurance policy, as described in Section 11629.71. The program shall be conducted in conjunction with the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan established under Section
 11620.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 487, Sec. 1.   (SB 1273)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.71.

A low-cost automobile insurance policy for purposes of the program established under this article shall have all of the following attributes:

(a) The policy shall offer coverage in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for bodily injury to, or death of, each person as a result of any one accident and, subject to that limit as to one person, the amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for bodily injury to, or death of all persons as a result of any one accident, and the amount of three thousand dollars ($3,000) for damage to property of others as a result of any one accident.

(b) The coverage required by Section 11580.2 shall be
 made available to the consumer. However, an insurer may charge a premium for that coverage in addition to the premium set forth in Section 11629.72. Notwithstanding the coverage amounts required by Section 11580.2 and Section 16056 of the Vehicle Code, uninsured motorist coverage issued in conjunction with a low-cost automobile policy under the program, with coverage limits at least equal to the limits of liability in the underlying low-cost automobile policy, shall satisfy the requirements of Section 11580.2 and the financial responsibility requirements of Sections 4000.37, 16021, and 16431 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) Medical payments coverage shall be made available to the consumer. However, an insurer may charge a premium for that coverage in addition to the premium set forth in Section 11629.72.

(d) The policy shall have an initial term of one year, renewable on an annual basis
 thereafter.

(e) The policy shall cover the person named in the policy, and to the same extent that insurance is provided to the named insured, any other person using the automobile, provided the use is with his or her permission, express or implied, and within the scope of that permission, except that the policy shall not cover members of the named insured’s household who do not satisfy the requirements of subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of Section 11629.73.

(f) The policy shall provide coverage for an automobile with a value of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less, as evidenced by the value given to the automobile by the Department of Motor Vehicles in assessing vehicle license fees, or another method of determining market value adopted by the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan Advisory Committee (CAARP Advisory Committee) and approved by the
 commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 487, Sec. 2.   (SB 1273)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.72.

(a) The annual rate offered under the program for each of the counties in California shall be established at a date according to the discretion of the commissioner. Surcharges, as a percentage of the base rate, shall be added to the base rate and that percentage shall be set at the discretion of the commissioner, if the named insured or a resident of the household of the named insured will be a driver of the automobile covered under the low-cost policy, and is a person 16 years of age or older to whom any of the following applies:

(1) Is an unmarried individual between 16 and 24 years of age.

(2) Operates a vehicle with a
 driver’s license issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code and has fewer than three years of driving history.

(3) Has fewer than three years of driving history.

(4) Has not been continually licensed to drive for the past three years.

(b) (1) The California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan shall make available to an insured under the program, subject to approval by the commissioner, a premium installment option pursuant to which an insured is required to pay not more than 20 percent of the total policy cost upon issuance of the low-cost policy, followed thereafter by seven other payments. The plan may make additional payment plans available, subject to
 approval by the commissioner.

(2) No other premium financing arrangement shall be permitted.

(c) Rates for policies issued under the program in each county or city and county shall be reviewed and revised as follows:

(1) Rates shall be sufficient to cover (A) losses incurred under policies issued under the program, and (B) expenses, including, but not limited to, all reasonable and necessary expenses such as the costs of administration, underwriting, taxes, commissions, and claims adjusting, that are incurred due to participation in the program. For purposes of this paragraph, “losses incurred” means claims paid, claims incurred and reported, and claims incurred but not yet reported. In assessing loss reserves, the commissioner
 shall only allow loss reserves that are estimated from actual losses in the program or comparable data by a licensed statistical agent, as adjusted to reflect coverage provided under the program.

(2) Rates shall be set so as to result in no projected subsidy of the program by those policyholders of insurers issuing policies under the program who are not participants in the program.

(3) Rates shall be set with respect to the program so as to result in no projected subsidy by policyholders in one county of policyholders in any of the other counties.

(4) (A) Commencing on January 1, 2015, and annually thereafter through January 1, 2017, the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan shall submit the loss
 and expense data, together with a proposed rate and the surcharge authorized by subdivision (a) for the low-cost automobile policy for the program, to the commissioner for approval in accordance with this chapter. The commissioner shall act on the recommendation within 90 days.

(B) After the January 1, 2017, rate filing, subsequent rate filings are mandatory if the rate indication is a change of greater than 7 percent from the previous filing, or at the discretion of the CAARP Advisory Committee if the rate indication is a change of less than 7 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 274, Sec. 1.   (SB 570)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.73.

A low-cost automobile insurance policy under the program shall only be available for purchase by persons who satisfy the following eligibility requirements:

(a) The person shall be in a household with an annual gross household income that does not exceed 250 percent of the federal poverty level, as defined in Part 6.2 (commencing with Section 12693) or as defined in an equivalent manner that is approved by the commissioner.

(b) The person shall be no less than 16 years of age and have been continuously licensed to drive an automobile for the previous three years, except that a person who has not been continually licensed to drive or
 has fewer than three years of driving history may qualify for the surcharge under subdivision (a) of Section 11629.72.

(c) The person shall have not more than one of either, but not both, of the following within the previous three years:

(1) A property damage only accident in which the driver was principally at fault.

(2) A point for a moving violation.

(d) The person shall not have on record within the previous three years, an at-fault accident involving bodily injury or death.

(e) The person shall not have a felony or misdemeanor conviction for a violation of the Vehicle Code on the person’s
 motor vehicle record.

(f) The person shall not be a student claimed as a dependent of another person for federal or state income tax purposes, unless the student resides at the same address where the student is claimed as a dependent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 274, Sec. 2.   (SB 570)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.731.

A person who meets the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 11629.73, and who claims that he or she meets the requirements of subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, of Section 11629.73 based entirely or partially on a driver’s license and driving experience obtained other than in the United States or Canada, shall be entitled to a rebuttable presumption that he or she is qualified to purchase a low-cost automobile insurance policy under the program if he or she has been licensed to drive pursuant to a license obtained in the United States or Canada for at least the previous 18 months and meets the criteria of subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive, for that period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 435, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.74.

(a) Application may be made through any producer certified by the plan. The applicant, in order to demonstrate financial eligibility to purchase a low-cost automobile insurance policy under the program, shall present at the time of applying for the policy documents deemed appropriate to confirm proof of income or other reliable evidence from a governmental agency or governmental means-tested program of the applicant’s gross annual household income.

(b) The applicant shall certify that the representations made in the documents submitted as proof of financial eligibility and in the application for the policy are true, correct, and
 contain no material misrepresentations or omissions of fact to the best knowledge and belief of the applicant.

(c) The certified producer shall forward the application, supporting documents, and the applicant’s certification to the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 274, Sec. 3.   (SB 570)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.745.

(a) An agent or broker, hereafter referred to as a producer, who conducts business in a county in which a low-cost automobile insurance policy is available pursuant to this article shall inform every new prospective automobile insurance policyholder who requests a minimum limits or basic limits insurance policy, or coverage to meet California’s minimum limits automobile insurance requirements, that the low-cost automobile insurance policy may be available for qualifying motorists. The information may be provided orally if the producer has been contacted by telephone, or in writing, but shall be communicated to the policyholder prior to the application for automobile insurance coverage in the language in which the producer has otherwise
 communicated with the consumer.

(b) If the consumer requests more information about the low-cost program the producer shall do either of the following:

(1) If the producer is California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan certified, provide the consumer with an explanation in an information pamphlet produced by the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan and approved and provided by the Department of Insurance of the qualifications, cost, and coverage provided by the policy. If the consumer qualifies for the low-cost policy and wishes to purchase the policy, the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan certified producer shall provide the application and, upon completion, submit the application, supporting documents, and the applicant’s certification to the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan. The submittal of the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan application may be in
 addition to any other coverage offered or applied for through the producer.

(2) If the producer is not California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan certified, the producer shall provide the consumer with the toll-free telephone number for the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan or the program’s Internet Web site address as an option to coverage offered by the producer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 487, Sec. 5.   (SB 1273)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.75.

(a) A certified producer shall provide to an applicant for a low-cost automobile insurance policy under this article a notice relating to coverage under the policy. The notice shall be provided in a separate document at the time of application and include the following statement in 14-point boldface type:“NoticeThis policy provides liability coverage for injuries or death caused to other persons in the total amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per person in any one accident, and up to a total amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for all persons in any one accident. The policy also provides up to three thousand dollars ($3,000) in
 liability coverage for property damage in any one accident.

These limits are very low compared to coverage outside of the low-cost automobile program.

If you are at fault for an accident where the damage exceeds the coverage provided by this policy, you can be held personally responsible for the losses.

If you want higher coverage limits, you must purchase a different policy.This policy does not cover damage to your own vehicle caused by you or anyone else. The plan offers uninsured motorist coverage as an
 option. However, comprehensive coverage and collision coverage are only available for purchase outside of the program.This policy does not cover your bodily injury or your death. You do have the option to purchase uninsured motorist bodily injury coverage in the total amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per person in any one accident and up to a total amount of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for all persons in any one accident.
 You also have the option to purchase medical payments coverage in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per person in any one accident.This policy does not cover any other driver in your household who meets any of the following criteria:(1) Is under 16 years of age.(2) Has less than three years of continuously licensed driving experience (unless the policy includes a surcharge for this driver).(3) Has more than one at-fault property damage only accident in which the driver was principally at fault in the last three years.

(4) Has more than one
 point for a moving violation in the last three years.

(5) Has both one at-fault property damage only accident in which the driver was principally at fault and one point for a moving violation in the last three years.(6) Has had an at-fault accident in the previous 3 years involving bodily injury or death.(7) Has a felony or misdemeanor conviction from a violation of the Vehicle Code on their motor vehicle record.”
(b) When the certified producer establishes delivery of the disclosure form specified in subdivision (a) by obtaining the signature of the applicant or insured, there shall be a
 conclusive presumption that the certified producer has complied with the disclosure requirements of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 274, Sec. 5.   (SB 570)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.76.

(a) (1) For a low-cost automobile insurance policy issued pursuant to the program, certified producers shall be entitled to the same commission rate as is paid by the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan for private passenger, nonfleet risks under Article 4 (commencing with Section 11620). The commission rate prescribed in this paragraph shall only be in effect until the conditions described in paragraph (2) are fulfilled.

(2) Effective upon the setting of policy rates in 2015 pursuant to Section 11629.72, for a low-cost automobile insurance policy issued pursuant to the program, certified producers shall be entitled to a commission rate of 12 percent or
 fifty dollars ($50), whichever is greater.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the commissioner may at any time establish a commission for a low-cost automobile insurance policy issued pursuant to the program and may make the commission effective on any policy originated within an entire year, or any portion of a year, as is needed to provide an incentive to certified producers to sell low-cost automobile insurance to eligible applicants. The commissioner shall not establish a commission pursuant to this subdivision if the commissioner determines that setting the commission rate will result in a lower commission than the commission paid by the California Automobile Assigned Risk Plan for private passenger, nonfleet risks under Article 4 (commencing with Section 11620).

(c) No other fees of any kind may be charged or collected pursuant to this section and the sale of a low-cost
 policy under this article shall not be conditioned on the purchase of any other product or service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 487, Sec. 7.   (SB 1273)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11629.77.
